Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 1.1. Purchasing Practices.

§ 56-233.1.
Public utilities purchasing practices.

Every public utility subject to the annual or biennial review provisions of Title 56 shall use competitive bidding to the extent practicable in its purchasing and construction practices. In addition, all such public utilities shall file with the Commission
and keep current a description of its purchasing and construction practices.

History.
1978, c. 627; 2007, cc. 888, 933; 2008, c. 522.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and substituted “biennial” for “annual.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 522 inserted “annual or” preceding “biennial review provisions” in the first sentence.

Law Review.

For an article, “Disentangling Deregulatory Takings,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1435 (2000).